test/src/gt-norm-yamls/old-yamls/V-TA-wicihew_gt-norm.yaml
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: wîcihakik
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: wîcihacik
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: wîcihâyâhkik
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: wîcihâyahkok
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: wîcihâyêkok 
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+1SgO: wîcihiyan
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: wîcihiyâhk
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+1SgO: wîcihiyêk    
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihât
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihâcik
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: wîcihimât
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: wîcihimâcik
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: wîcihâyit
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimak
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimat
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimâyâhk
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimâyahk
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimâyêk
    
    
    
    
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: wîcihit
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: wîcihisk
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: wîcihikoyâhk
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: wîcihikoyahk
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: wîcihikoyêk

    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: wîcihicik
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: wîcihiskik
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: wîcihikoyâhkik
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: wîcihikoyahkok
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: wîcihikoyêkok

    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2SgO: wîcihitân
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: wîcihitâhk
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg+2PlO: wîcihitakok

    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: wîcihikot
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: wîcihikocik
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihikoyit
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: wîcihimit
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: wîcihimisk
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: [wîcihikoyâhk, wîcihikowâyâhk]
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: [wîcihikoyêk, wîcihikowâyêk]
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: [wîcihikoyahk, wîcihikowâyahk]



    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3SgO: wîcih
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3SgO: wîcihâtân
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3SgO: wîcihihk
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+3PlO: wîcihik
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+12Pl+3PlO: wîcihâtânik
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+3PlO: wîcihihkik

    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: wîcihâhkan
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: wîcihâhkahk
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: wîcihâhkêk
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: wîcihâhkanik
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO: wîcihâhkahkok
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: wîcihâhkêkok

    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg+1SgO: wîcihin
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: wîcihinân
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Imm+2Pl+1SgO: wîcihik
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+1SgO: wîcihîhkan
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: wîcihîhkâhk
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+1SgO: wîcihîhkêk
    
    
    

    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3SgO: wîcihaki
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3SgO: wîcihaci
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3SgO: wîcihâyâhki
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3SgO: [wîcihâyahko, wîcihâyahki]
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3SgO: wîcihâyêko

    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihâci
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihâtwâwi
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: wîcihâyici
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+3PlO: wîcihakwâwi
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+3PlO: wîcihatwâwi
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+3PlO: wîcihâyâhkwâwi
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+3PlO: wîcihâyahkwâwi
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+3PlO: wîcihâyêkwâwi

    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1SgO: wîcihici
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2SgO: wîcihiski
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+1PlO: wîcihikoyâhki
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+12PlO: [wîcihikoyahko, wîcihikoyahki]
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Sg+2PlO: wîcihikoyêko
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: wîcihikoci
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: wîcihikotwâwi 
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihikoyici
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1SgO: wîcihitwâwi
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2SgO: wîcihiskwâwi
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+1PlO: wîcihikoyâhkwâwi
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+12PlO: wîcihikoyahkwâwi
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+3Pl+2PlO: wîcihikoyêkwâwi
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimaki
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimati
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimâyâhki
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wîcihimâyahko, wîcihimâyahki]
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: wîcihimâyeko

    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: wîcihimici
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: wîcihimiski
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: [wîcihikoyâhki, wîcihikowâyâhki]
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: [wîcihikoyêko, wîcihikowâyêko]
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: [wîcihikoyahko, wîcihikoyahki, wîcihikowâyahko, wîcihikowâyahki]
    
    
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg+1SgO: wîcihiyani
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Pl+1SgO: wîcihiyêko
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+2Sg/Pl+1PlO: wîcihiyâhki
    
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2SgO: wîcihitâni
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Sg+2PlO: wîcihitako
    wîcihêw+V+TA+Fut+Cond+1Pl+2Sg/PlO: wîcihitâhki
